tex/context/patterns/lang-sk.pat
\patterns {
a1
[aacute]1
[adiaeresis]1
e1
[eacute]1
i1
[iacute]1
o1
[oacute]1
[ocircumflex]1
u1
[uacute]1
y1
[yacute]1
i2a
i2[aacute]
i2e
i2u
o2u
c2h
d2z
d2[zcaron]
2b1b
2b1c
2b1[ccaron]
2b1d
2b1[dcaron]
2b1f
2b1g
2b1h
2b1c2h
2b1j
2b1k
2b1l
2b1[lcaron]
2b1m
2b1n
2b1[ncaron]
2b1p
2b1r
2b1s
2b1[scaron]
2b1t
2b1[tcaron]
2b1v
2b1w
2b1x
2b1z
2b1[zcaron]
2b1d2z
2b1d2[zcaron]
2c1b
2c1c
2c1[ccaron]
2c1d
2c1[dcaron]
2c1f
2c1g
2c1c2h
2c1j
2c1k
2c1l
2c1[lcaron]
2c1m
2c1n
2c1[ncaron]
2c1p
2c1r
2c1s
2c1[scaron]
2c1t
2c1[tcaron]
2c1v
2c1w
2c1x
2c1z
2c1[zcaron]
2c1d2z
2c1d2[zcaron]
2[ccaron]1b
2[ccaron]1c
2[ccaron]1[ccaron]
2[ccaron]1d
2[ccaron]1[dcaron]
2[ccaron]1f
2[ccaron]1g
2[ccaron]1h
2[ccaron]1c2h
2[ccaron]1j
2[ccaron]1k
2[ccaron]1l
2[ccaron]1[lcaron]
2[ccaron]1m
2[ccaron]1n
2[ccaron]1[ncaron]
2[ccaron]1p
2[ccaron]1r
2[ccaron]1s
2[ccaron]1[scaron]
2[ccaron]1t
2[ccaron]1[tcaron]
2[ccaron]1v
2[ccaron]1w
2[ccaron]1x
2[ccaron]1z
2[ccaron]1[zcaron]
2[ccaron]1d2z
2[ccaron]1d2[zcaron]
2d1b
2d1c
2d1[ccaron]
2d1d
2d1[dcaron]
2d1f
2d1g
2d1h
2d1c2h
2d1j
2d1k
2d1l
2d1[lcaron]
2d1m
2d1n
2d1[ncaron]
2d1p
2d1r
2d1s
2d1[scaron]
2d1t
2d1[tcaron]
2d1v
2d1d2z
2d1d2[zcaron]
2[dcaron]1b
2[dcaron]1c
2[dcaron]1[ccaron]
2[dcaron]1d
2[dcaron]1[dcaron]
2[dcaron]1f
2[dcaron]1g
2[dcaron]1h
2[dcaron]1c2h
2[dcaron]1j
2[dcaron]1k
2[dcaron]1l
2[dcaron]1[lcaron]
.as4t4ro3
.atmo3
.a2u1to3
2[dcaron]1m
2[dcaron]1n
2[dcaron]1[ncaron]
2[dcaron]1p
2[dcaron]1r
2[dcaron]1s
2[dcaron]1[scaron]
2[dcaron]1t
2[dcaron]1[tcaron]
2[dcaron]1v
2[dcaron]1z
2[dcaron]1[zcaron]
2[dcaron]1d2z
2[dcaron]1d2[zcaron]
2f1b
2f1c
2f1[ccaron]
2f1d
2f1[dcaron]
2f1f
2f1g
2f1h
2f1c2h
2f1j
2f1k
2f1l
2f1[lcaron]
2f1m
2f1n
2f1[ncaron]
2f1p
2f1r
2f1s
2f1[scaron]
2f1t
2f1[tcaron]
2f1v
2f1z
2f1[zcaron]
2f1d2z
2f1d2[zcaron]
2g1b
2g1c
2g1[ccaron]
2g1d
2g1[dcaron]
2g1f
2g1g
2g1h
2g1c2h
2g1j
2g1k
2g1l
2g1[lcaron]
2g1m
2g1n
2g1[ncaron]
2g1p
2g1r
2g1s
2g1[scaron]
2g1t
2g1[tcaron]
2g1v
2g1z
2g1[zcaron]
2g1d2z
2g1d2[zcaron]
2h1b
2h1c
2h1[ccaron]
2h1d
2h1[dcaron]
2h1f
2h1g
2h1h
2h1c2h
2h1j
2h1k
2h1l
2h1[lcaron]
2h1m
2h1n
2h1[ncaron]
2h1p
2h1r
2h1s
2h1[scaron]
2h1t
2h1[tcaron]
2h1v
2h1z
2h1[zcaron]
2h1d2z
2h1d2[zcaron]
2c2h1b
2c2h1c
2c2h1[ccaron]
2c2h1d
2c2h1[dcaron]
2c2h1f
2c2h1g
2c2h1h
2c2h1c2h
2c2h1j
2c2h1k
2c2h1l
2c2h1[lcaron]
2c2h1m
2c2h1n
2c2h1[ncaron]
2c2h1p
2c2h1r
2c2h1s
2c2h1[scaron]
2c2h1t
2c2h1[tcaron]
2c2h1v
2c2h1w
2c2h1[zcaron]
2c2h1d2z
2c2h1d2[zcaron]
2j1b
2j1c
2j1[ccaron]
2j1d
2j1[dcaron]
2j1f
2j1g
2j1h
2j1c2h
2j1j
2j1k
2j1l
2j1[lcaron]
2j1m
2j1n
2j1[ncaron]
2j1p
2j1r
2j1s
2j1[scaron]
2j1t
2j1[tcaron]
2j1v
2j1w
2j1x
2j1z
2j1[zcaron]
2j1d2z
2j1d2[zcaron]
2k1b
2k1c
2k1[ccaron]
2k1d
2k1[dcaron]
2k1f
2k1g
2k1h
2k1c2h
2k1j
2k1k
2k1l
2k1[lcaron]
2k1m
2k1n
2k1[ncaron]
2k1p
2k1r
2k1s
2k1[scaron]
2k1t
2k1[tcaron]
2k1v
2k1w
2k1x
2k1z
2k1[zcaron]
2k1d2z
2k1d2[zcaron]
2l1b
2l1c
2l1[ccaron]
2l1d
2l1[dcaron]
2l1f
2l1g
2l1h
2l1c2h
2l1j
2l1k
2l1l
2l1[lcaron]
2l1m
2l1n
2l1[ncaron]
2l1p
2l1r
2l1s
2l1[scaron]
2l1t
2l1[tcaron]
2l1v
2l1z
2l1[zcaron]
2l1d2z
2l1d2[zcaron]
2[lcaron]1b
2[lcaron]1c
2[lcaron]1[ccaron]
2[lcaron]1d
2[lcaron]1[dcaron]
2[lcaron]1f
2[lcaron]1g
2[lcaron]1h
2[lcaron]1c2h
2[lcaron]1j
2[lcaron]1k
2[lcaron]1l
2[lcaron]1[lcaron]
2[lcaron]1m
2[lcaron]1n
2[lcaron]1[ncaron]
2[lcaron]1p
2[lcaron]1r
2[lcaron]1s
2[lcaron]1[scaron]
2[lcaron]1t
2[lcaron]1[tcaron]
2[lcaron]1v
2[lcaron]1z
2[lcaron]1[zcaron]
2[lcaron]1d2z
2[lcaron]1d2[zcaron]
2m1b
2m1c
2m1[ccaron]
2m1d
2m1[dcaron]
2m1f
2m1g
2m1h
2m1c2h
2m1j
2m1k
2m1l
2m1[lcaron]
2m1m
2m1n
2m1[ncaron]
2m1p
2m1r
2m1s
2m1[scaron]
2m1t
2m1[tcaron]
2m1v
2m1z
2m1[zcaron]
2m1d2z
2m1d2[zcaron]
2n1b
2n1c
2n1[ccaron]
2n1d
2n1[dcaron]
2n1f
2n1g
2n1h
2n1c2h
2n1j
2n1k
2n1l
2n1[lcaron]
2n1m
2n1n
2n1[ncaron]
2n1p
2n1r
2n1s
2n1[scaron]
2n1t
2n1[tcaron]
2n1v
2n1w
2n1x
2n1z
2n1[zcaron]
2n1d2z
2n1d2[zcaron]
2[ncaron]1b
2[ncaron]1c
2[ncaron]1[ccaron]
2[ncaron]1d
2[ncaron]1[dcaron]
2[ncaron]1f
2[ncaron]1g
2[ncaron]1h
2[ncaron]1c2h
2[ncaron]1j
2[ncaron]1k
2[ncaron]1l
2[ncaron]1[lcaron]
2[ncaron]1m
2[ncaron]1n
2[ncaron]1[ncaron]
2[ncaron]1p
2[ncaron]1r
2[ncaron]1s
2[ncaron]1[scaron]
2[ncaron]1t
2[ncaron]1[tcaron]
2[ncaron]1v
2[ncaron]1z
2[ncaron]1[zcaron]
2[ncaron]1d2z
2[ncaron]1d2[zcaron]
2p1b
2p1c
2p1[ccaron]
2p1d
2p1[dcaron]
2p1f
2p1g
2p1h
2p1c2h
2p1j
2p1k
2p1l
2p1[lcaron]
2p1m
2p1n
2p1[ncaron]
2p1p
2p1r
2p1s
2p1[scaron]
2p1t
2p1[tcaron]
2p1v
2p1w
2p1x
2p1z
2p1[zcaron]
2p1d2z
2p1d2[zcaron]
2r1b
2r1c
2r1[ccaron]
2r1d
2r1[dcaron]
2r1f
2r1g
2r1h
2r1c2h
2r1j
2r1k
2r1l
2r1[lcaron]
2r1m
2r1n
2r1[ncaron]
2r1p
2r1r
2r1s
2r1[scaron]
2r1t
2r1[tcaron]
2r1v
2r1w
2r1x
2r1z
2r1[zcaron]
2r1d2z
2r1d2[zcaron]
2s1b
2s1c
2s1[ccaron]
2s1d
2s1[dcaron]
2s1f
2s1g
2s1h
2s1c2h
2s1j
2s1k
2s1l
2s1[lcaron]
2s1m
2s1n
2s1[ncaron]
2s1p
2s1r
2s1s
2s1[scaron]
2s1t
2s1[tcaron]
2s1v
2s1z
2s1[zcaron]
2s1d2z
2s1d2[zcaron]
2[scaron]1b
2[scaron]1c
2[scaron]1[ccaron]
2[scaron]1d
2[scaron]1[dcaron]
2[scaron]1f
2[scaron]1g
2[scaron]1h
2[scaron]1c2h
2[scaron]1j
2[scaron]1k
2[scaron]1l
2[scaron]1[lcaron]
2[scaron]1m
2[scaron]1n
2[scaron]1[ncaron]
2[scaron]1p
2[scaron]1r
2[scaron]1s
2[scaron]1[scaron]
2[scaron]1t
2[scaron]1[tcaron]
2[scaron]1v
2[scaron]1w
2[scaron]1x
2[scaron]1z
2[scaron]1[zcaron]
2[scaron]1d2z
2[scaron]1d2[zcaron]
2t1b
2t1c
2t1[ccaron]
2t1d
2t1[dcaron]
2t1f
2t1g
2t1h
2t1c2h
2t1j
2t1k
2t1l
2t1[lcaron]
2t1m
2t1n
2t1[ncaron]
2t1p
2t1r
2t1s
2t1[scaron]
2t1t
2t1[tcaron]
2t1v
2t1w
2t1x
2t1z
2t1[zcaron]
2t1d2z
2t1d2[zcaron]
2[tcaron]1b
2[tcaron]1c
2[tcaron]1[ccaron]
2[tcaron]1d
2[tcaron]1[dcaron]
2[tcaron]1f
2[tcaron]1g
2[tcaron]1h
2[tcaron]1c2h
2[tcaron]1j
2[tcaron]1k
2[tcaron]1l
2[tcaron]1[lcaron]
2[tcaron]1m
2[tcaron]1n
2[tcaron]1[ncaron]
2[tcaron]1p
2[tcaron]1r
2[tcaron]1s
2[tcaron]1[scaron]
2[tcaron]1t
2[tcaron]1[tcaron]
2[tcaron]1v
2[tcaron]1w
2[tcaron]1x
2[tcaron]1z
2[tcaron]1[zcaron]
2[tcaron]1d2z
2[tcaron]1d2[zcaron]
2v1b
2v1c
2v1[ccaron]
2v1d
2v1[dcaron]
2v1f
2v1g
2v1h
2v1c2h
2v1j
2v1k
2v1l
2v1[lcaron]
2v1m
2v1n
2v1[ncaron]
2v1p
2v1r
2v1s
2v1[scaron]
2v1t
2v1[tcaron]
2v1v
2v1w
2v1x
2v1z
2v1[zcaron]
2v1d2z
2v1d2[zcaron]
2z1b
2z1c
2z1[ccaron]
2z1d
2z1[dcaron]
2z1f
2z1g
2z1h
2z1c2h
2z1j
2z1k
2z1l
2z1[lcaron]
2z1m
2z1n
2z1[ncaron]
2z1p
2z1r
2z1s
2z1[scaron]
2z1t
2z1[tcaron]
2z1v
2z1z
2z1[zcaron]
2z1d2z
2z1d2[zcaron]
2[zcaron]1b
2[zcaron]1c
2[zcaron]1[ccaron]
2[zcaron]1d
2[zcaron]1[dcaron]
2[zcaron]1f
2[zcaron]1g
2[zcaron]1h
2[zcaron]1c2h
2[zcaron]1j
2[zcaron]1k
2[zcaron]1l
2[zcaron]1[lcaron]
2[zcaron]1m
2[zcaron]1n
2[zcaron]1[ncaron]
2[zcaron]1p
2[zcaron]1r
2[zcaron]1s
2[zcaron]1[scaron]
2[zcaron]1t
2[zcaron]1[tcaron]
2[zcaron]1v
2[zcaron]1z
2[zcaron]1[zcaron]
2[zcaron]1d2z
2[zcaron]1d2[zcaron]
2d2z1k
2d2z1n
2d2z1r
2d2z1s
2d2[zcaron]1[scaron]
2x1t
2x1n
2b1[racute]
2[racute]1b
2d2z1[racute]
2[racute]1d2z
2d2z1[lcaron]
2[racute]1d2[zcaron]
2d2[zcaron]1[lcaron]
a1[iacute]2
a1o2
e1[aacute]2
e1[iacute]2
e1o2
e1[oacute]2
e1u2
i1o2
o1a2
o1e2
o1i2
o1o2
u1a2
u1[aacute]2
u1i2
u1[iacute]2
u1o2
u1u2
y1a2
y1e2
y1[oacute]2
y1u2
a2u1
a2i1
b2l3b
3b2l3[ccaron]
b2l3c2h
3b2l3k
3b2[lcaron]3k
3b2l3[ncaron]
b2l3[scaron]
b2[lcaron]3[scaron]
3b2r3b
b2r3d
3b2r3k
3b2[racute]3k
3b2r3l
3b2[racute]3[lcaron]
3b2r3n
3b2r3[ncaron]
3b2r3v
b2r3z
b3s2c
b3s2t
c3k2t
3c2r3[ccaron]
3c2[racute]3[ccaron]
3c2r3k
3c2[racute]3k
c3t2v
3[ccaron]2l3n
3[ccaron]2r3[ccaron]
[ccaron]2r3p
3[ccaron]2r3t
3[ccaron]2r3v
d3c4h4n
3d2l3b
3d2l3h
d2l3n
3d2l3[zcaron]
3d2[lcaron]3[zcaron]
3d2r3d
3d2r3g
d2r3l
3d2r3k
3d2r3m
d2r3n
3d2r3v
3d2r3z
3d2r3[zcaron]
3d2[racute]3[zcaron]
d3s2v
d3s2t
d3v2r
3f2r3[ccaron]
3f2r3f
3f2r3k
3f2[racute]3k
3f2r3m
3f2r3n
3g2l3g
3g2r3c
3g2r3g
3h2l3b
3h2[lcaron]3b
3h2l3t
3h2m2l
3h2r3b
3h2[racute]3b
3h2r3[ccaron]
3h2r3d
3h2r3d2z
3h2r3k
3h2r3m
3h2r3n
3h2r3[ncaron]
3h2r3t
3h2r3v
3c2h2l3p
3c2h2r3b
3c2h2r3[ccaron]
c2h2r3c4h
3c2h2r3l
3c2h2r3t
j2c2h3n
j3s2t
j3[scaron]2le
j3t2m
j3t2r
3k2l3b
3k2[lcaron]3b
3k2l3[ccaron]
3k2l3z
3k2[lcaron]3z
k2r3b
3k2r3[ccaron]
3k2[racute]3[ccaron]
3k2[racute]3d
3k2r3k
3k2[racute]3k
3k2[racute]3m
3k2r3p
3k2r3s
3k2r3t
3k2r3v
k3s2[lcaron]
k2s3n
k3t2r
l3d2r
[lcaron]3k2n
l3t2r
m3b2l
m3b2[lcaron]
m3b2r
m3f2l
m3f2r
m3k2n
3m2l3[ccaron]
3m2l3k
m3p2l
m3p2[lcaron]
m3p2r
m3p2s
3m2r3h
m2r3c4h
3m2r3k
m2r3l
m2r3[scaron]
m2r3t
3m2r3v
3m2r3z
3m2[racute]3z
m3s2t
m3[scaron]2t
n3d[lcaron]a
n3d2r
n3f2l
n3f2r
n3g2h
n3g2l
n3g2[lcaron]
n2g3n
n3g2r
n3g2v
n3k2c
n3k2h
n3k2n
n3k2r
n3k2v
n3s2c
n3[scaron]2p
n3[scaron]2t
n3t2g
n3t2l
n3t2n
n3t2r
n2[zcaron]3m
3p2l3n
3p2l3[ncaron]
3p2[lcaron]3[ncaron]
3p2l3z
3p2[lcaron]3z
3p2[lcaron]3[zcaron]
3p2[racute]3c
3p2r3[ccaron]
3p2r3d
3p2r3s
3p2r3[scaron]
p3[scaron]2[tcaron]
p3t2r
r2b3n
r3g2[lcaron]
r3g2r
r3g2s
r3k2d
r2k3n
r3k2t
r3k2v
r3p2c
r3p2[ccaron]
r3p2r
r3s2p
r3[scaron]2[ccaron]
r3[scaron]2l
r3[scaron]2r
r2t3m
r3t2n
r2t3[ncaron]
r3t2r
r3t2v
3s4c4h4n
s2k3l
s2k3m
s2k3n
s3k2r
s3k2v
3s2l3n
3s2l3[ncaron]
3s2l3z
s3p2r
3s2r3d
3s4[racute]3k
3s4r3[scaron]
s3t2k
[ocircumflex]s4t3k2[aacute]r3s4t4v
s2t3l
s3t2m
s2t3n
s3t2r
s3t2v
s2[tcaron]3h
s2[tcaron]3m
s2[tcaron]3p
[scaron]3k2l
[scaron]3k2r
[scaron]3t2r
3[scaron]4t4v
t3k2l
t3k2n
3t2l3[ccaron]
3t2l3k
t3h2l
3t4r3[ccaron]
3t4r3h
3t2r3l
3t2r3k
3t2r3m
a4t2r3n
3t2r3n
3t2[racute]3n
3t2[racute]3[ncaron]
3t4r3p
3t2r3v
3t2[racute]3[zcaron]
3v2l3[ccaron]
3v2[lcaron]3[ccaron]
3v2l3h
3v2l3k
3v2l3n
3v2r3h
3v2r3c2h
3v2r3l
3v2[racute]3[scaron]
3v2[racute]3t
3v2r3z
3v2[racute]3z
3v4z4d
3v4z4h
3v4z4n
3v3z2[tcaron]
z3d2n
noz5d4r
3z4d4r
3z4d4v
z3g2n
3z4h4r
3z2r3k
3z2r3n
3z4v4l
[zcaron]2d3n
3[zcaron]2l3[ccaron]
3[zcaron]2l3t
3[zcaron]2[lcaron]t
3[zcaron]2r3[dcaron]
[zcaron]3s2t
x3p2l
x3p2r
x3t2r
3b2l4[ccaron]3n
3b2[lcaron]4[ccaron]3k
3b2l4n3k
3b2[lcaron]3k2n
3b2r4b3l
3b2r4b3t
3b2r4[ccaron]3k
3b2r4d3c
3b2[racute]4d3n
3b2r3h2l
3b4[racute]4k3n
3b4r4m3b
3b4r4n3[ccaron]
3b4r4n3k
3b4r4[scaron]3l
3b4r4t3l
3b4r4t3n
3b4r4v3n
3b4r4z3d
3b4r4z3l
3b4r4z3n
b3s2t2r
3c4[racute]4[ccaron]3k
3c4r4k3n
3c4v4r3[ccaron]
3c4v4r3k
3c4v4[racute]3k
3c4v4r3l
3[ccaron]4l4n3k
3[ccaron]4r3[ccaron]4r
3[ccaron]4r4c4h3n
3[ccaron]4r4p3k
3[ccaron]4r4p3n
3[ccaron]4r4t3n
3[ccaron]4v4r3k
3[ccaron]4v4r3l
3d4l4b3n
d4[lcaron]4[zcaron]3k
d4l4[zcaron]3n
d4[lcaron]4[zcaron]3n
3d4r4c3n
3d4r4g3[lcaron]
3d4r4g3n
3d4r4h3n
3d4r4n3[ccaron]
3d4r4n3k
3d4r4s3n
3d4r4[zcaron]3b
3d4r4[zcaron]3k
3f4r4c3k
3f4r4c3n
3f4r4[ccaron]3k
3f4r4f3l
3f4r4k3n
3f4r4n3d
3f4r4n3d4[zcaron]
3f4r4n3g
3f4r4n3k
3g4l4g3n
3g2r4c3k
3h2[lcaron]4b3k
3h2l3t4n
3h2r4b3[ccaron]
3h2r4[ccaron]3k
h2r4d3l
3h2r4g3[lcaron]
3h2r4k3[lcaron]
3h2r4k3n
3h2[racute]4k3n
3h2r4n3[ccaron]
3h2r4s3t
3h2r4s3[tcaron]
3ch4[lcaron]4p3k
3c2h2r4b3t
3c2h2r4c4h3l
3c2h2r4c4h3[lcaron]
3c4h4r4s3t
j3s4t4r
j3s4t4v
3k4l4b3[ccaron]
3k4l4b3k
3k4l4z3k
3k4l4z3n
3k4r4[ccaron]3m
3k4r4[ccaron]3n
3k4r4k3v
3k4r4m3n
3k4[racute]4m3n
3k4r4p3[ccaron]
3k4r4s3t
3k4r4[scaron]3t
3k4r4t3k
3k4r4v3n
3m2l4[ccaron]3k
3m2[lcaron]4k3n
3m2[lcaron]4k3v
3m2l4s3n
m3p4r3p
m3p4r3v
3m4r4k3n
3m4r4k3v
3m4r4m3l
3m4r4n3[ccaron]
3m4r4n3k
3m4[racute]4[scaron]3t
3m4[racute]4t3v
3m4r4z3l
3m4r4z3k
3m4r4z3n
n4g3s4t
n3[scaron]4t4r
n3t4l3m
3p2l4z3l
3p2[lcaron]4z3n
p2[racute]4c3n
3p2r4[ccaron]3k
3p4r4d3n
3p4[racute]4c2h3n
3p4r4s3k
3p4r4t3k
r2s3k4d
r2s3k4t
[ccaron]er4s3t4v
3s4l4n3k
3s4k4r3z
3s4m4r3c
3s4m4r3[ccaron]
3s4m4r3d
3s4m4r3k
3s4m4r3t
3s4p4r3c4h
3s4r4d3c
3s4r4k3n
3s4r4s3t
3s4t4[lcaron]3k
s3t4r3b
ko4s3t4r3[ccaron]
3s4t4r3[ccaron]
3s4t4[racute]3h
3s4t4r3k
s4t4r3v
4s4[tcaron]5k4r[aacute]t
3[scaron]4k4l3b
3[scaron]4k4r3k
3[scaron]4k4[racute]3k
ma[scaron]3k4r3t
3[scaron]4k4r3t
3[scaron]4p4l3h
3[scaron]4t4r3b
[scaron]4t4r3n
3[scaron]4t4v4r3t
3[scaron]4t4v4r3[tcaron]
3t2[lcaron]4c3[tcaron]
3t2r4b3l
t2r4[ccaron]3k
3t2r4d3l
3t2r4h3l
3t2r4h3n
3t2r4k3n
3t2r4k3v
3t2r4m3n
3t4[racute]4p3n
3t2r4[zcaron]3k
3t2r4[zcaron]3n
3t2v4r3d
3t2v4r3d4z
3t2v4[racute]3d4z
3v2l4h3[ccaron]
3v2l4h3k
3v2l4h3n
3v2l4n3k
3v2l4n3n
3v4r4h3n
3v4r4k3n
3v4[racute]4z3g
3v4r4z3g
3v4r4z3n
3v4r4[zcaron]3l
3z4h4[racute]3[ncaron]
3z4r4n3n
3[zcaron]4l4[ccaron]3n
3[zcaron]4l4t3n
3[zcaron]4r4d3k
3b4r4n3k4n
b3d4[lcaron]4[zcaron]3n
3c4v4r4[ccaron]3k
3c4v4r4n3k
3[ccaron]4[racute]4s3t4v
3[ccaron]4r4t4t3n
3[ccaron]4v4r4k3n
3d4r4[zcaron]3g4r
